Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2553.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 5 TLSB 6638YH (4) 91 ak/ko H.F. 2553 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 249A.5 Durable medical equipment 1 reconditioning and refurbishment ââ pilot program. 2 1. A Medicaid durable medical equipment reconditioning 3 and refurbishment pilot program is established within the 4 department. The department shall develop and administer the 5 pilot program as follows: 6 a. The department shall coordinate the pilot program 7 with the local affiliate of a national 501(c)(3) nonprofit 8 organization that provides essential services to children 9 and adults with disabilities, older adults, veterans, and 10 the families of children and adults with disabilities, older 11 adults, and veterans. 12 b. The department shall establish a process to track each 13 item of durable medical equipment purchased under the medical 14 assistance program and provided to a recipient. The department 15 shall institute an informational campaign that upon delivery 16 to a recipient of an item of durable medical equipment, the 17 recipient and the recipientâs caregivers are clearly informed 18 that upon the death of, or because of a change in the health 19 status of, the recipient, the item of durable medical equipment 20 is no longer necessary, and the recipient or the recipientâs 21 caregiver must contact the local affiliate of the national 22 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization described in paragraph âaâ to 23 schedule pick up of the item of durable medical equipment. 24 c. After the local affiliate of the national 501(c)(3) 25 nonprofit organization described in paragraph âaâ picks up 26 an item of durable medical equipment, the local affiliate 27 shall arrange for the reconditioning or refurbishing of the 28 item of durable medical equipment. After reconditioning or 29 refurbishment, the item of durable medical equipment shall be 30 placed in the local affiliateâs inventory, and shall be made 31 available free of charge to a recipient who is in need of the 32 refurbished or reconditioned item of durable medical equipment. 33 2. Annually, on or before October 31, the director of 34 health and human services shall submit a report to the general 35 -1- LSB 6638YH (4) 91 ak/ko 1/ 3 H.F. 2553 assembly regarding the status of the pilot program and must 1 include the following information for the immediately preceding 2 fiscal year: 3 a. The total number, and type, of items of durable medical 4 equipment purchased under the medical assistance program and 5 provided to a recipient. 6 b. The total number, and type, of items of durable medical 7 equipment purchased under the medical assistance program, 8 provided to a recipient, and picked up by a local affiliate 9 of the national 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization described in 10 subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . 11 c. The total number, and type, of items of durable medical 12 equipment purchased under the medical assistance program, 13 provided to a recipient, and refurbished or reconditioned by a 14 local affiliate of a national 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization 15 described in subsection 1, paragraph âaâ . 16 d. The total number, and type, of items of durable medical 17 equipment purchased under the medical assistance program, 18 provided to a recipient, refurbished or reconditioned by a 19 local affiliate of a national 501(c)(3) nonprofit organization 20 described in subsection 1, paragraph âaâ , and made available 21 free of charge to a recipient who is in need of the refurbished 22 or reconditioned item of durable medical equipment. 23 e. The total number, and type, of items of refurbished 24 or reconditioned durable medical equipment currently in the 25 inventory of the local affiliate of a national 501(c)(3) 26 nonprofit organization described in subsection 1, paragraph 27 âaâ . 28 f. The aggregate cost of the pilot program. 29 3. This section is repealed July 1, 2030. 30